California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
A statement of the method and manner of adding vitamins and minerals shall be filed with and approved by the director, and, when offered for sale, such vitamin and mineral milk shall not be of a standard which is below the legal requirements of market milk. When added, vitamin D shall be present in such quantity that each quart of the milk contains 400 International Units thereof within limits of good manufacturing practice. When added, vitamin A shall be present in such quantity that each quart of the milk contains not less than 2,000 International Units thereof within limits of good manufacturing practice.

The requirements of this section shall apply to all fluid market milk products.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 134.)
-------------------------------------------

35752.

This division does not prohibit the freezing and holding in cold storage of market cream or concentrated market cream, its subsequent standardization with market milk or skim milk produced from market milk, and its sale as market cream if the standardized product otherwise conforms to all the standards and requirements in this division for market cream. Payment procedure for market cream so frozen or stored shall be pursuant to Article 22 (commencing with Section 62441), Chapter 2, Part 3, Division 21 of this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35753.

This division does not prohibit the freezing and holding in cold storage of market goat milk and its subsequent sale as market milk if at the time of sale it meets all the standards and requirements which are specified in this division for market milk.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35754.

This division does not prohibit the sterilization of market goat milk by subjecting it to a temperature which is high enough to sterilize it, holding it in storage, and subsequently selling it as market milk if at the time of sale the market goat milk meets all standards and requirements which are specified in this division for market milk.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35755.

It is unlawful for any person to sell any market milk other than graded milk as provided in this division in any city or county or any combination of cities and counties in which a milk inspection service has been established, either by or with the approval of the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35756.

This division, and the regulations of the director are not a limitation on the power of a municipality or county, by ordinance or regulation, to establish compulsory pasteurization of market milk or reasonable higher standards for milk fat and solids-not-fat than those which are established in this division, but such standards shall apply only to market milk after standardization by a milk distributor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35757.

The secretary, in compliance with Section 407 of this code and Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, may adopt regulations pertaining to temperature requirements for market milk delivered to consumers. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, these regulations may establish temperature requirements for market milk delivered to consumers that differ from any or all requirements provided for in this chapter. In adopting these regulations, the secretary shall take into consideration the preservation of high quality market milk for consumers, as well as avoidance of hardship and unreasonable expense for persons engaged in the processing, packaging, and distribution of market milk.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 427, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Market Milk Standards and Grades [35781. - 35788.]

35781.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this article, market milk shall not contain any of the following:

(1) More than 15,000 bacteria per milliliter or more than 10 coliform bacteria per milliliter if to be sold as raw milk to the consumer.

(2) More than 50,000 bacteria per milliliter if to be sold as raw milk for pasteurization or more than 750 bacteria per milliliter after having been subjected to laboratory pasteurization which has a time-temperature equivalent to that required in Section 34001 before pasteurization.

(3) More than 15,000 bacteria per milliliter or more than 10 coliform bacteria per milliliter at time of delivery to the consumer, if pasteurized.

(4) More than 750 coliform bacteria per milliliter in raw milk for pasteurization. Samples shall be taken while the milk is on the premises of the producer.

(5) More than 800,000 somatic cells per milliliter, as determined by direct microscopic somatic cell count, electronic somatic cell count, or optical somatic cell count. After January 1, 1990, the maximum somatic cell count shall be 600,000 somatic cells per milliliter, as determined by the methods specified in this paragraph. This paragraph does not apply to market goat milk.

(b) The director may, by regulation, require different standards for raw market milk for pasteurization from the standards in this section if he or she determines, after an administrative hearing, that the standards are necessary to protect or improve milk quality.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 339, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

35781.5.

A milk producer delivering in cans on delivery to a plant receiving both graded market milk and ungraded market milk or manufacturing milk shall label each can containing market milk as to the producer and grade of such market milk.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 191.)
-------------------------------------------

35782.

Market milk shall be cooled to 45 degrees Fahrenheit or below, whether it is raw or pasteurized, and, except as otherwise provided in Section 35783, shall be so maintained until it is delivered to the consumer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 427, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

35783.

Market milk shall be cooled as indicated by a recording thermometer to 50 degrees Fahrenheit (10 degrees Celsius) or less within four hours of the commencement of the first milking and to 45 degrees Fahrenheit (7 degrees Celsius) or less within two hours of the completion of milking. The blend temperature after the first milking and subsequent milkings, or milk in transit on bulk milk tankers, shall not exceed 50 degrees Fahrenheit (10 degrees Celsius). The secretary may promulgate regulations to provide for temporary deviations from the requirements of this section that may occur as a result of emergencies arising from equipment failure, or as a result of other unusual circumstances; provided, however, that the quality and safety of the product are not adversely affected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 236, Sec. 1.   Effective August 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

35783.1.

A recording thermometer shall be installed in each dairy farm milk storage tank used to cool or store market milk during the milking process. If a farm pickup tanker is used in lieu of a dairy farm tank, the recording thermometer shall be installed in the pipeline following an effective cooling device that cools the milk to 45 degrees Fahrenheit (7 degrees Celsius) or less. Nothing in this section shall be construed as meaning that a recording thermometer must be attached when milk tankers are moved over the road. The secretary shall issue regulations providing standards for these thermometers including installation and operation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 140, Sec. 75.   (AB 1164)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

35784.

Market milk, except as provided in Section 35784.2, at the time of delivery to the consumer, shall contain not less than 3.5 percent of milk fat and not less than 8.7 percent of solids not fat. The minimum percentages of milk fats and solids not fat required by this section may vary by an amount no greater than 0.1 of 1 percent, if the total combined percentages of milk fat and solids not fat, at the time of delivery to the consumer, equals or exceeds 12.2 percent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 301, Sec. 2.   (AB 466)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

35784.1.

Market milk produced and marketed pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 35921) of this chapter and Sections 35861 and 35891 shall contain not less than 3.5 percent of milk fat and not less than 8.5 percent of solids not fat. The minimum percentages of milk fat and solids not fat required by this section, may vary by an amount no greater than 0.1 of 1 percent, provided that the total combined percentages of milk fat and solids not fat, at the time of delivery to the consumer, shall equal or exceed 12 percent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

35784.2.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, 6 percent milk is a standard of identity and shall contain not less than 6 percent of milk fat and not less than 8.7 percent of solids not fat at the time of delivery to the consumer.

(2) The minimum percentages of milk fat and solids not fat prescribed by this section may vary by an amount no greater than 0.1 of 1 percent, if the total combined percentages of milk fat and solids not fat equals or exceeds 14.7 percent at the time of delivery to the consumer.

(b) The secretary may establish milk standards for 6 percent milk
 sold in the state.

(c) Six percent milk shall meet all of the following:

(1) All the standards and requirements for market milk as specified in this division, except as provided for in subdivision (a).

(2) The applicable labeling requirements required pursuant to Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The name used on the label shall be “6 percent milk” or “6% milk.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   (AB 466)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

35785.

Market milk which is produced for sale under the supervision of an approved milk inspection service, or a milk inspection service which is established and conducted by the director, shall be in conformity with the provisions for the respective grades as defined in this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35786.

Market goat milk may be standardized to a milk fat content of not less than 2.8 percent. Market goat milk at the time of delivery to the consumer shall contain not less than 8.0 percent of solids not fat.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 512, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

35787.

Where a milk inspection service has been approved or established pursuant to this code, market milk shall be graded and designated into one of the following classes:

(a) “Certified milk.”

(b) “Guaranteed milk.”

(c) “Grade A milk.”

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35788.

It is unlawful for any person to sell any milk as, or under the representation of, guaranteed or grade A milk, except under the supervision of a milk inspection service which is approved by the director or which is established and conducted by the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Market Cream Standards [35811. - 35811.]

35811.

Market cream shall conform to all of the standards which are set for market milk of the same grade except those which relate to milk fat and solids-not-fat, and the optional addition of harmless, edible stablizer-emulsif ier either singularly or in combination not exceeding 0.6 of 1 percent, as approved by the director, and except that the maximum bacterial count for pasteurized market cream shall be 20,000 per gram.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 537.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Pasteurized and Raw Market Milk [35831. - 35834.]

35831.

Pasteurized market milk shall be cooled to a temperature of 50 degrees Fahrenheit or below immediately after pasteurization and shall be so maintained until it is delivered to the consumer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35832.

(a) Repasteurized milk may only be reprocessed and sold as a “Grade A” product under the following conditions and restrictions:

(1) Milk and milk products drained from processing equipment at the end of a run, collected from a defoamer system, and milk or milk product solids rinsed from equipment, containers, or pipelines shall be repasteurized only if that milk or those milk products are handled in a sanitary manner and maintained at 45 degrees Fahrenheit (7 degrees Celsius) or less. When the handling or cooling, or both, of that milk or those milk products is not in compliance with this requirement, they shall be discarded.

(2) Equipment, designated areas, or rooms utilized for handling, processing, and storage of returned packaged milk or milk products are maintained, operated, cleaned, and sanitized so as to preclude the contamination of Grade A products and equipment and the Grade A operations. The repasteurization of milk and milk products shipped in milk tank trucks, which have been pasteurized at another Grade A milk plant and have been handled in a sanitary manner and maintained at 45 degrees Fahrenheit (7 degrees Celsius) or less, is permitted.

(3) Packaged milk and milk products that have physically left the premises of the processing plant shall not be repasteurized for Grade A use.

(4) Milk and milk products from damaged, punctured, or otherwise contaminated containers, or milk products from out-of-code containers, shall not be repasteurized for Grade A use.

(5) All milk and milk products that have overflowed, leaked, or been spilled or improperly handled shall be discarded.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the secretary may, on a specific request, authorize reprocessing of packaged milk and milk products provided all other requirements of this section, including proper storage temperature and container integrity, are complied with.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 202, Sec. 1.   (AB 1910)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

35833.

All pasteurized market milk and market milk products shall be bottled or canned only in the plant where pasteurized, except as otherwise provided in this division.

This section does not apply to market cream or cultured market milk products having a product acidity of not less than 0.20 percent expressed as lactic acid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 191.)
-------------------------------------------

35834.

Raw market milk and pasteurized market milk shall not be bottled in the same milk products plant for sale and distribution within a city or county which maintains an approved milk inspection service, except where an official representative of such approved milk inspection service is present during the period of handling, processing, or bottling such market milk, or except in those milk products plants where all market milk which is received meets the requirements for grade A raw milk.

This section does not apply to market cream.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Guaranteed Market Milk [35861. - 35863.]

35861.

Guaranteed raw milk is market milk which conforms to all of the following minimum requirements:

(a) The health of the cows and goats shall be determined at least once each month by an official representative of an approved milk inspection service, or a milk inspection service which is established by the director.

(b) It shall be produced on dairy farms which score not less than 90 percent on the dairy farm scorecard.

(c) It shall be bottled on the premises where produced and delivered in containers which have the pouring lip completely protected from contamination.

(d) It shall be cooled as provided in Section 35782, and so maintained until it is delivered to the consumer, at which time it shall contain not more than 10,000 bacteria per milliliter or not more than 10 coliform bacteria per milliliter.

(e) It shall be sold to the consumer within 30 hours after production and labeled to indicate the date of sale to the consumer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 339, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

35862.

All persons who come in contact with guaranteed raw milk shall exercise scrupulous cleanliness and shall not be afflicted with any communicable disease or in a condition to disseminate the germs of any communicable disease which is liable to be conveyed by milk. The absence of such germs in all such persons shall be determined by bacteriological and physical examination by a health department which maintains an approved milk inspection service, or other person or laboratory which is approved in writing by the department, conducted at the time of employment and every six months thereafter in a manner which is approved by the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35863.

Guaranteed pasteurized milk shall conform to all the requirements for guaranteed raw milk, except that it shall contain not more than 3,000 bacteria per milliliter at the time of delivery to the consumer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Grade A Market Milk [35891. - 35893.]

35891.

Grade A raw milk is market milk which conforms to all the following minimum requirements:

(a) The health of the cows and goats shall be determined at least once in two months by an official representative of an approved milk inspection service, or a milk inspection service which is established by the director.

(b) It shall be produced on dairy farms that score not less than 90 percent on the dairy farm scorecard.

(c) It shall be cooled as provided in Section 35782 and so maintained until delivered to the consumer, at which time it shall contain not more than 15,000 bacteria per milliliter or more than 10 coliform bacteria per milliliter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 339, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

35892.

All persons who come in contact with grade A raw milk shall exercise scrupulous cleanliness and shall not be afflicted with any communicable disease or be in a condition to disseminate the germs of any communicable disease which is liable to be conveyed by milk. The absence of such germs in all such persons may at the discretion of an approved or established milk inspection service be determined by bacteriological and physical examination in such manner as may be prescribed by the director and by such person or laboratory which is approved in writing by the department, conducted at the time of employment and every six months thereafter in a manner which is approved by the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35893.

Milk for grade A pasteurized milk is market milk that conforms to all the following minimum requirements:

(a) The health of the cows or goats shall be determined at least once in six months by an official representative of an approved milk inspection service, or a milk inspection service that is established by the director.

(b) The milk shall be cooled as provided in Section 35783.

(c) It shall be produced on dairy farms that score not less than 90 percent on the dairy farm scorecard that is adopted by the director.

(d) Shall meet the standards of Section 35781 or the regulation adopted pursuant thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 339, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Certified Milk [35921. - 35928.]

35921.

Certified milk is market milk which conforms to the rules, regulations, methods, and standards for the production and distribution of certified milk adopted by the county milk commission established in a county pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

35922.

Certified milk shall bear the certification of a milk commission which shall be appointed as provided by this article by the board of supervisors in any county in which certified milk was produced on January 1, 1968. The board of supervisors of any other county may create a commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

35923.

A county milk commission shall consist of six members who reside in the county where the commission is located and who shall be appointed by the board of supervisors for a term of four years and shall be eligible for reappointment. The members shall be appointed as follows:

(a) A physician who is a member of a county medical association organized under and approved by the Medical Society of the State of California.

(b) A physician nominated by the county health department.

(c) A veterinarian, who shall be a member of the county or regional veterinarian association.

(d) A physician nominated by a producer or producers of certified milk in the county.

(e) A physician nominated by the American Association of Medical Milk Commissions, Incorporated.

(f) A public member, appointed by the board of supervisors.

If no nomination is made by a group so authorized to nominate a member under subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, the board of supervisors shall appoint a person who is a member of any of the designated organizations authorized to nominate members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 994.)
-------------------------------------------

35924.

A county milk commission shall adopt rules, regulations, and standards governing the production, distribution, and sale of certified milk, including unpasteurized milk, as it deems necessary to protect public health and safety.

The rules, regulations, and standards adopted by a county milk commission shall conform as nearly as practicable to, or may be more restrictive than, the rules, regulations, and standards for the production, distribution, and sale of milk, including unpasteurized milk, adopted by the American Association of Medical Milk Commissions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

35924.5.

A county milk commission shall give reasonable notice to the public of its meetings, and shall hold its public hearings in public buildings.

Members of the commission shall receive twenty-five dollars ($25) per diem for each day spent on official business of the commission, payable from the fees collected pursuant to this article. No member of the commission shall travel beyond the boundaries of the state on official business without prior approval of the county board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 994.)
-------------------------------------------

35925.

A county milk commission shall certify milk, including unpasteurized milk, for any applicant for certification whose milk complies with the rules, regulations, and standards for production, distribution and sale of milk adopted by the commission and prescribed in this code, irrespective of whether the milk is produced in the county in which the commission is located or in a contiguous county, so long as there is not a milk commission located in such a contiguous county. Provided, however, that the power of a milk commission to certify milk produced in the contiguous county shall terminate at such time as a milk commission is created in such contiguous county.

Nothing in this section shall affect any milk inspection, including an approved milk inspection service pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 33051) of this part or any other inspection, for milk which is produced in such contiguous county and certified by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 994.)
-------------------------------------------

35926.

A county milk commission may establish such fees, and expend funds derived therefrom, as are reasonably necessary to defray the costs of certifying milk.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

35927.

A county milk commission may conduct any tests that it finds are reasonably necessary to carry out the purposes of this article and may employ personnel to conduct such tests and for such other duties as the commission deems necessary.

All applicants for certification shall submit samples for testing when requested to do so by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

35928.

(a) When the director, any health officer acting as an agent of the director, or a milk inspection officer acting as an agent of the director having jurisdiction, determines that the oral ingestion by a human being of any raw milk or certified raw milk supply has caused disease in a human being, he shall prohibit the use, sale, or disposal of such milk, except by a method approved by the director, until such cause has been corrected or eliminated. Application may be made by the director or any such officer to the superior court of the county where the supply is produced or stored in order to obtain an injunction prohibiting the use, sale, or disposal of such milk. If the court determines that it is a reasonable medical probability that the ingestion by a human being of such milk supply was the proximate cause of a case of disease in such human being and that the milk supply is unsafe for human consumption, the court shall take such action as is necessary to enforce the order. When the court thereafter determines that it is a reasonable medical probability that the ingestion by a human being of such milk supply will not be the proximate cause of a case of disease in a human being and that the milk supply is safe for human consumption, such order of prohibition shall be dissolved.

(b) When the director, any health officer acting as an agent of the director, or a milk inspection officer acting as an agent of the director having jurisdiction, has good cause to believe, as a result of either a laboratory test by a laboratory certified by the department or a recognized test, on the animal or the milk from the animal or the herd, that a case of typhoid fever, salmonella infection, bacillary dysentery, diphtheria, respiratory streptococcal infection, brucellosis, or tuberculosis, is present in one or more cows or in the milk of one or more cows of any dairy herd, he shall prohibit the use, sale, or disposal of the raw milk or certified raw milk from the herd containing the diseased cow or cows, except by a method approved by the director, until such cause has been corrected or eliminated. Application may be made by the director or any such officer to the superior court of the county where the milk supply is produced or stored in order to obtain an injunction prohibiting the use, sale, or disposal of such milk. If the court determines that it is a reasonable medical probability that such disease is present in the milk of one or more cows of any dairy herd and that the milk supply is unsafe for human consumption, the court shall take such action as is necessary to enforce the order. When the court thereafter determines that it is a reasonable medical probability that such disease is no longer present on the premises of such dairy and that the milk supply is safe for human consumption, such order of prohibition shall be dissolved.

(c) When the director, any health officer acting as an agent of the director, or a milk inspection officer acting as an agent of the director, has good cause to believe, as a result of a laboratory test by a laboratory certified by the department or a recognized test, on the animal or the milk, that a raw milk or certified raw milk supply under the control of the producer of such milk supply is suspected to be the source of an infection for a communicable disease, or that a raw milk or certified raw milk supply may cause an infection of a communicable disease, he shall prohibit the use, sale, or disposal of such milk, except by a method approved by the director, until such cause has been corrected or eliminated. However, in the case of such a milk supply being under the control of either a retailer or distributor to retailers, the director or his agent may only prohibit the use, sale, or disposal of such milk in a manner used for any other market milk or milk product.

(d) Actions taken pursuant to the provisions of subdivision (c) shall in each instance be subject to judicial review under Section 1085 of the Code of Civil Procedure by the superior court of the county with jurisdiction. Such review shall be conducted for the purpose of determining if the action taken shall be sustained or dissolved. At issue in the review shall be the questions of adequate protection of the public health and safety, and the guarantee of due process of law for the persons controlling, or producer of, the raw or certified raw milk supply affected by the action. The department shall have the burden of proof to sustain the actions of the director or his agents at issue in the review.

In the event the court, after such review, finds that the action by the director shall be dissolved, the department shall bear the actual court costs incurred by the persons controlling, or producers of, the raw or certified raw milk supply, and their actual testing costs for any animal or milk tests previously ordered by the department to determine if such milk supply, which is the subject of such court action, is the source of, or may cause, an infection for a communicable disease.

As used in this subdivision, “testing costs” means the actual cost of obtaining samples to be tested, the actual cost of laboratory tests, and the actual cost for extra labor to confine the cattle for the purpose of testing.

(e) In addition to any procedural requirements of Section 32731, any routine inspection conducted for the purpose of taking samples of milk or inspecting any cow pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c) shall be conducted only after the issuance of an inspection warrant as provided in Title 13 (commencing with Section 1822. 50) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, unless such inspection is conducted with the knowledge of the persons controlling the milk supply or cow. In the taking of a sample of milk pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), or (c), a duplicate of any sample of raw milk or certified raw milk shall be left with the persons in control of, or producers of, such milk.

(f) The Legislature finds and declares that the state does not intend to limit or restrict the availability of certified raw milk and certified raw milk products to those persons desiring to consume such milk and such products, provided such milk and products meet standards of sanitation and wholesomeness at least equal to market milk that is grade A raw milk, as defined in Section 35891.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 974.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Homogenized Market Milk and Cream [35941. - 35945.]

35941.

Homogenized market milk is market milk which has been subjected to a process or treatment in such manner as to insure the breakup of the fat globules to such an extent that no visible cream separation will occur on the milk after 48 hours storage at a temperature of between 40 and 50 degrees Fahrenheit and the fat percentage of the top 100 cc. of milk in a quart bottle, or proportionate volumes in containers of other sizes, does not differ by more than 10 percent of itself from the milk fat percentage of the remaining milk as determined after thorough mixing. In removing the top 100 cc. of milk, it shall be siphoned off. Homogenized market milk shall otherwise conform to all requirements for market milk.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35943.

Homogenized market cream is market cream which has been subjected to a process or treatment in such manner as to insure breakage of the fat globules to such an extent that no visible cream separation will occur after 48 hours. Homogenized market cream shall otherwise conform with all other requirements for market cream.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35944.

Homogenized market milk or homogenized market cream shall not be mixed with market milk or market cream which has not been homogenized.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

35945.

Homogenized milk and homogenized cream shall be so labeled.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Half-and-Half [35971. - 35971.]

35971.

Half-and-half is a food that complies with Section 131.180 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations. Half-and-half shall contain not more than 20,000 bacteria per milliliter and not more than 10 coliform bacteria per milliliter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 339, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9.5. Ultra-Filtered Milk Products [35975. - 35975.]

35975.

(a) For purposes of this article, “ultra-filtered milk products” are market milk products resulting from the filtration of milk to alter the relative quantities of milk solids, including proteins, lactose, and minerals, but excluding fat components. When lactose has been completely or partially removed by filtration, the percentage of total milk solids, not including fat components, may be reduced by no more than the percentage of lactose removed.

(b) The secretary shall have the authority to establish milk standards for ultra-filtered milk products sold in the state.

(c) Ultra-filtered milk products
 shall meet all standards and requirements for market milk that are specified in this division, except as provided in subdivision (a).

(d) Ultra-filtered milk products shall be labeled in accordance with the applicable provisions of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The term “ultra-filtered” shall be included in the product name on the product label.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 510, Sec. 1.   (SB 1039)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Labeling and Advertising [36001. - 36005.]

36001.

The following information shall at all times appear plainly and in a conspicuous place on, or be securely attached to, every cap, bottle, can, or other container of all market milk which is sold:

(a) The class or grade of the market milk, unless the market milk is being sold in bulk to a distributor.

(b) The word “raw,” if the market milk has not been pasteurized.

(c) The word “pasteurized” if the market milk has been pasteurized.

(d) The name and address of the distributor or original bottler.

If the name and address of the distributor is used, the milk products plant license number of the original bottler, as assigned annually by the director, may be used in lieu of the name and address of the original bottler.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

36002.

All labels which are required by Section 36001 shall be in capital letters of a size and boldness as to be legible by the purchaser or consumer. If the available space on any cap, bottle, or container for such labeling is not sufficient for the full name of the distributor, then a sufficient portion of the distributor’s name which clearly identifies such distributor may be used in lieu of the entire distributor’s name.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

36004.

(a) At the time of sale to the consumer by a retail store of any product designated in this section, there shall appear on the package or container of the product the date established by the processor as the date by which the product should normally be used to ensure consumer quality.

(b) This section applies to the following products:

(1) Market milk.

(2) Market cream.

(3) Any milk product that is required by this code, or by any regulation adopted by the secretary pursuant to this code, to be made from market milk or any component or derivative of market milk.

(c) This section does not apply to any milk or milk products processed, packaged, and sold by distributors directly to consumers.

(d) This section does not apply to any bulk shipments of milk or milk products between distributors.

(e) The secretary shall, in compliance with applicable provisions of this code and Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and after public hearing or hearings, adopt regulations pertaining to (1) responsibility for affixing to packages or other containers the quality assurance date provided for in this section, (2) the manner, style, form, and place of affixation of the date to packages and other containers in a conspicuous place in a form that is readily seen and easily understood by the buyer, and (3) the administration and
 enforcement of the requirements of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 911, Sec. 1.   (AB 660)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

36005.

If a product is made from goat milk, either the phrase “goat milk” or “made from goat milk” shall immediately precede or follow the name of the product wherever the name appears, and in the same type size and style as the product name.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 512, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Bottle Caps and Labels [36031. - 36033.]

36031.

It is unlawful for any person that sells or handles market milk, except the original bottler of the market milk, to have in his possession, or under his control, any milk bottle cap or label, except the caps or labels that are affixed to the filled containers at the time of delivery to the seller or handler.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

36032.

It is unlawful for any person that sells or handles market milk to remove any cap or label from any milk container and attach such cap or label to another milk container.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

36033.

It is unlawful for any person to sell or use any milk bottle caps which are not packed by the manufacturer in single column in unopened, dustproof tubular packages.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Misrepresentation [36061. - 36065.]

36061.

No false, misleading, or deceptive name, picture, symbol, mark, word, or other representation shall appear on any milk bottle, bottle cap, can, or other container, nor on any advertisement for market milk.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

36062.

A label or advertisement of market milk is false, misleading, or deceptive if in any particular it is untrue, or by ambiguity or inference creates a misleading or deceptive impression regarding the production, handling, processing, quality, composition, merits, or value of such market milk.
